src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-kueaqtt_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kuẹʹtt: # Noun 1E-stem 'Saami tent/kota' - full paradigm
# 
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom: kuẹʹtt
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen: kuäʹđ
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc: kuäʹđ
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill: kuätˈta
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc: kuäʹđest
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com: kueʹđin
     kueʹtt+N+Ess: kuẹʹtten
     kueʹtt+N+Par: kuẹʹtted
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe: [kuäʹđtaa, kuäʹđtää]
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom: kuäʹđ
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen: kueʹđi
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc: kueʹđid
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill: kueʹđid
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc: kueʹđin
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com: kueʹđivuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe: [kueʹđitaa, kueʹđitää]

##
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: kuättam
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: kuättad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: kuẹʹttes
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: kuẹʹttem
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: kuẹʹtted
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: kuẹʹttez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: kuättan
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: kuäđad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: kuäʹđes
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: kuẹʹtten
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: kuäʹđed
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: kuäʹđez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: kuättan
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: kuäđad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: kuäʹđes
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: kuẹʹtten
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: kuäʹđed
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: kuäʹđez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: kuätˈtsan
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: kuätˈtsad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: kuätˈtses
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: kuätˈtseen
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: kuätˈtseed
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: kuätˈtseez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kuäˈʹđstan
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kuäˈʹđstad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: kuäˈʹđstes
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: kuäˈʹđsteen
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: kuäˈʹđsteed
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: kuäˈʹđsteez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kueʹđinan
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: kueʹđinad
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: kueʹđines
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: kueʹđineen
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: kueʹđineed
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: kueʹđineez
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: kuättantää
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: kuäđadtää
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: kuäʹđestää
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: kuẹʹttentää
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: kuäʹđedtää
     kueʹtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: kuäʹđeztää
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxSg1: kuäʹtˈtnan
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxSg2: kuäʹtˈtnad
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxSg3: kuäʹtˈtnes
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxPl1: kuäʹtˈtneen
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxPl2: kuäʹtˈtneed
     kueʹtt+N+Ess+PxPl3: kuäʹtˈtneez
#
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: kuättan
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: kuäđad
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: kuäʹđes
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: kuẹʹtten
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: kuäʹđed
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: kuäʹđez
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: kueʹđään
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: kueʹđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: kueʹđees
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: kueʹđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: kueʹđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: kueʹđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: kueʹđään
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: kueʹđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: kueʹđees
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: kueʹđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: kueʹđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: kueʹđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: kueʹđään
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kueʹđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: kueʹđees
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: kueʹđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: kueʹđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: kueʹđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: kueʹđinan
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: kueʹđinad
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: kueʹđines
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: kueʹđineen
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: kueʹđineed
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: kueʹđineez
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: kueʹđäänvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: kueʹđäädvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: kueʹđeesvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: kueʹđeenvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: kueʹđeedvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: kueʹđeezvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: kueʹđääntää
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: kueʹđäädtää
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: kueʹđeestää
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: kueʹđeentää
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: kueʹđeedtää
     kueʹtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: kueʹđeeztää
#
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: kuäđaž
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: kuäđa
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: kuäđa
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: kuäđʼže
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: kuäđast
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: kuäđain
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [kuäđataa, kuäđatää]
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: kuäđʼžen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: kuäđʼžed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: kuäđa
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: kuäđai
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: kuäđaid
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: kuäđaid
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: kuäđain
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: kuäđaivuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [kuäđaitaa, kuäđaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: kuäđžam
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: kuäđžad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: kuäđžes
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: kuäđžeem
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: kuäđžeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: kuäđžeez
     
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: kuäđžan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: kuäđžad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: kuäđžes
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: kuäđžeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: kuäđžeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: kuäđžeez
     
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: kuäđžan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: kuäđžad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: kuäđžes
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: kuäđžeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: kuäđžeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: kuäđžeez

     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: kuäđžasan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: kuäđžasad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: kuäđžasas
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: kuäđžeʹsen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: kuäđžeʹsed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: kuäđžeʹsez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kuäˈđstan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kuäˈđstad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: kuäˈđstes
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: kuäˈđsteen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: kuäˈđsteed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: kuäˈđsteez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kuäđainan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: kuäđainad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: kuäđaines
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: kuäđaineen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: kuäđaineed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: kuäđaineez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: kuäđʼžantää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: kuäđʼžadtää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: kuäđʼžestää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: kuäđʼžeentää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: kuäđʼžeedtää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: kuäđʼžeeztää

#     
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: kuäđʼžan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: kuäđʼžad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: kuäđʼžes
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: kuäđʼžeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: kuäđʼžeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: kuäđʼžeez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: kuäđään
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: kuäđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: kuäđees
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: kuäđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: kuäđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: kuäđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: kuäđään
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: kuäđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: kuäđees
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: kuäđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: kuäđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: kuäđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: kuäđään
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kuäđääd
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: kuäđees
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: kuäđeen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: kuäđeed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: kuäđeez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: kuäđainan
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: kuäđainad
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: kuäđaines
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: kuäđaineen
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: kuäđaineed
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: kuäđaineez
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: kuäđäänvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: kuäđäädvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: kuäđeesvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: kuäđeenvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: kuäđeedvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: kuäđeezvuiʹm
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: kuäđääntää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: kuäđäädtää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: kuäđeestää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: kuäđeentää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: kuäđeedtää
     kueʹtt+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: kuäđeeztää
